Arkansas, session 2025, HB1465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 20, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
27-20-121. Liability for dirtbike use on private property —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Dirtbike" means a motorcycle designed primarily for off-
road use;
(2) “Inherent risk of dirtbike use” means the dangers or
conditions that are an integral part of dirtbike use on roads, trails, paths,
or other surfaces, including without limitation:
(A) Injury or death caused by:
(i) A change or variation in the surface that may
cause a participant to lose control, lose his or her balance, or crash the
dirtbike; or
(ii) A collision with a natural or man-made object;
(B) Operator error, including equipment failure due to
*MBM077*
03-06-2025 14:15:14 MBM077

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 HB1465
operator error;
(C) Attack or injury by an animal; and
(D) The aggravation of an injury, illness, or condition
because the injury, illness, or condition occurred in a remote place where
medical facilities are not available;
(3) “Motorcycle” means a motor vehicle having a seat or saddle
for use of the rider and designed to travel on no more than three (3) wheels
in contact with the ground;
(4) “Owner of private property” means an individual, group,
club, partnership, corporation, or business entity, whether or not operating
for profit, or an employee or organized agent, that sponsors, organizes,
rents, or provides to a participant the use of private property for dirtbike
use; and
(5) “Participant” means an individual who rents, leases, or uses
a dirtbike on private property whether or not a fee is paid.
(b)(1)(A) A participant assumes the inherent risk of dirtbike use by
engaging in dirtbike use on private property.
(B) A participant or his or her representative shall not
have a claim against, maintain an action against, or recover from an owner of
private property for loss, damage, or injury to, or the death of, the
participant resulting from the inherent risk of dirtbike use.
(2) An owner of private property is not liable for an injury to
or the death of a participant resulting from the inherent risk of dirtbike
use.
(c) This section does not:
(1) Apply to a relationship between an employer and employee
under the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq.; or
(2) Prevent or limit the liability of an owner of private
property that:
(A) Intentionally injures a participant;
(B) Commits an act or omission of gross negligence
concerning the safety of a participant that proximately causes injury to or
the death of the participant;
(C) Provides an unsafe dirtbike to a participant and knew
or should have known that the dirtbike was unsafe to the extent that it could
cause an injury;
03-06-2025 14:15:14 MBM077

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 HB1465
(D) Fails to use the degree of care that an ordinarily
careful and prudent person would use under the same or similar circumstances;
or
(E) Commits other acts, errors, or omissions that
constitute willful or wanton misconduct, gross negligence, or criminal
conduct that proximately causes injury, damage, or death.

/s/Gonzales




























03-06-2025 14:15:14 MBM077